Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1302
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the
Nebraska Shooting Range Protection Act:

(1) Firearm
has the same meaning as in section 28-1201;

(2) Person means an individual, association,
proprietorship, partnership, corporation, club, political subdivision, or
other legal entity;

(3) Shooting range means an area or facility
designated or operated primarily for the use of firearms or archery and which
is operated in compliance with the act and the shooting range performance
standards. Shooting range excludes shooting preserves or areas used for law
enforcement or military training; and

(4) Shooting range performance standards
means the revised edition of the National Rifle Association's range source
book titled A Guide To Planning And Construction adopted by the National Rifle
Association, as such book existed on January 1, 2009, for the safe operation
of shooting ranges.

Laws 2009, LB503, § 2.